Wisconsin, session 2025, AB602.
do enact as follows:AB602,1Section 1. 16.004 (25) of the statutes is created to read:16.004 (25) Qualifying scholarship granting organizations. The department shall annually submit to the U.S. secretary of the treasury and publish on the department’s website a list of scholarship granting organizations that meet the requirements under 26 USC 25F and are located in this state. The department shall certify to the U.S. secretary of the treasury the department’s authority to submit the list on behalf of the state and comply with any other requirement under 26 USC 25F, including any regulations or guidance issued under 26 USC 25F (h), to ensure that the state is eligible to participate in taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026.AB602,2Section 2. Nonstatutory provisions.(1) Election. By no later than July 1, 2026, the governor shall elect to participate in the federal tax credit program established under 26 USC 25F for individuals who make qualified contributions to scholarship granting organizations beginning with the taxable year beginning after December 31, 2026. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab602 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab602 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB602 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB602 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB602: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting